Louisiana, session 2026, HB737.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:170(A)(2) and R.S. 17:170.1(Section heading) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§170. Immunization of persons entering schools, kindergartens, colleges,
proprietary or vocational schools, and day care centers for the first time;
immunization of persons entering sixth grade; electronic transmission of
immunization compliance reports; exemption
A.
* * *
(2) The schedule shall include but not be limited to measles, mumps, rubella,
diphtheria, tetanus, whooping cough, poliomyelitis, meningococcal disease, and
hemophilus influenzae Type B invasive infections.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1330 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 737
* * *
§170.1. Immunizations of persons registering for courses at postsecondary
education institutions requirements; exceptions; electronic transmission of
immunization compliance reports Immunization information; meningococcal
disease; postsecondary education institutions
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 17:170.1(A) and (C) through (G) and 170.4 are hereby repealed in
their entirety.